installation/solr-6.x/kramerius/cs_CZ_ascii.aff
SFX Q Y 186
SFX Q   um          0          [^aeiouyaeiouyuer]um
SFX Q   rum         r          [aeiouyaeiouyue]rum
SFX Q   rum         er         [^aeiouyaeiouyue]rum
SFX Q   s           d          is
SFX Q   ba          eb         [cdlstvzz]ba
SFX Q   bo          eb         [cdlstvzz]bo
SFX Q   by          eb         [cdlstvzz]by
SFX Q   ba          eb         [aeiouyaeiouyue]rba
SFX Q   bo          eb         [aeiouyaeiouyue]rbo
SFX Q   by          eb         [aeiouyaeiouyue]rby
SFX Q   ba          b          [^aeiouyaeiouyue]rba
SFX Q   bo          b          [^aeiouyaeiouyue]rbo
SFX Q   by          b          [^aeiouyaeiouyue]rby
SFX Q   ba          b          [^cdlrstvzz]ba
SFX Q   bo          b          [^cdlrstvzz]bo
SFX Q   by          b          [^cdlrstvzz]by
SFX Q   ca          k          [srn]ca
SFX Q   co          k          [srn]co
SFX Q   ca          c          [^srn]ca
SFX Q   co          c          [^srn]co
SFX Q   e           0          e
SFX Q   a           0          [cddfghjnprsstwxzz]a
SFX Q   o           0          [cddfghjnprsstwxzz]o
SFX Q   y           0          [dfhpsz]y
SFX Q   dka         dek        dka
SFX Q   dko         dek        dko
SFX Q   dky         dek        dky
SFX Q   nka         nek        nka
SFX Q   nko         nek        nko
SFX Q   nky         nek        nky
SFX Q   tka         tek        tka
SFX Q   tko         tek        tko
SFX Q   tky         tek        tky
SFX Q   ka          k          [aeiouyaeiouyue]ka
SFX Q   ko          k          [aeiouyaeiouyue]ko
SFX Q   ky          k          [aeiouyaeiouyue]ky
SFX Q   ka          ek         [^aeiouyaeiouyuedtnk]ka
SFX Q   ka          0          kka
SFX Q   ko          ek         [^aeiouyaeiouyuedtn]ko
SFX Q   ky          ek         [^aeiouyaeiouyuedtn]ky
SFX Q   la          l          [aeiouyaeiouyue]la
SFX Q   lo          l          [aeiouyaeiouyue]lo
SFX Q   ly          l          [aeiouyaeiouyue]ly
SFX Q   la          el         [^aeiouyaeiouyue]la
SFX Q   lo          el         [^aeiouyaeiouyue]lo
SFX Q   ly          el         [^aeiouyaeiouyue]ly
SFX Q   ma          m          [aeiouyaeiouyue]ma
SFX Q   mo          m          [aeiouyaeiouyue]mo
SFX Q   my          m          [aeiouyaeiouyue]my
SFX Q   ma          em         [^aeiouyaeiouyue]ma
SFX Q   mo          em         [^aeiouyaeiouyue]mo
SFX Q   my          em         [^aeiouyaeiouyue]my
SFX Q   na          en         [aeiouyaeiouyue][lr]na
SFX Q   no          en         [aeiouyaeiouyue][lr]no
SFX Q   ny          en         [aeiouyaeiouyue][lr]ny
SFX Q   na          n          [^aeiouyaeiouyue][lr]na
SFX Q   no          n          [^aeiouyaeiouyue][lr]no
SFX Q   ny          n          [^aeiouyaeiouyue][lr]ny
SFX Q   na          n          [aeiouyaeiouyue]na
SFX Q   ne          n          ne
SFX Q   no          n          [aeiouyaeiouyue]no
SFX Q   ny          n          [aeiouyaeiouyue]ny
SFX Q   na          en         [^aeiouyaeiouyuelr]na
SFX Q   no          en         [^aeiouyaeiouyuelr]no
SFX Q   ny          en         [^aeiouyaeiouyuelr]ny
SFX Q   ra          r          [aeiouyaeiouyue]ra
SFX Q   ro          r          [aeiouyaeiouyue]ro
SFX Q   ry          r          [aeiouyaeiouyue]ry
SFX Q   ra          er         [^aeiouyaeiouyuer]ra
SFX Q   ra          0          rra
SFX Q   ro          er         [^aeiouyaeiouyue]ro
SFX Q   ry          er         [^aeiouyaeiouyue]ry
SFX Q   ta          t          [^h]ta
SFX Q   to          t          [^h]to
SFX Q   ty          t          [^h]ty
SFX Q   ta          t          [^c]hta
SFX Q   to          t          [^c]hto
SFX Q   ty          t          [^c]hty
SFX Q   ta          t          [^au]chta
SFX Q   to          t          [^au]chto
SFX Q   ty          t          [^au]chty
SFX Q   ta          et         [au]chta
SFX Q   to          et         [au]chto
SFX Q   ty          et         [au]chty
SFX Q   va          ev         [hktz]va
SFX Q   vo          ev         [hktz]vo
SFX Q   vy          ev         [hktz]vy
SFX Q   va          v          [^hktz]va
SFX Q   vo          v          [^hktz]vo
SFX Q   vy          v          [^hktz]vy
SFX Q   ek          ku         ek
SFX Q   ek          kem        ek
SFX Q   ek          ky         ek
SFX Q   ek          ku         ek
SFX Q   ek          kum        ek
SFX Q   ek          cich       ek
SFX Q   ek          kach       cek
SFX Q   el          lu         el
SFX Q   el          le         el
SFX Q   el          lem        el
SFX Q   el          ly         el
SFX Q   el          lu         el
SFX Q   el          lum        el
SFX Q   el          lech       el
SFX Q   nek         nku        nek
SFX Q   nek         nkem       nek
SFX Q   nek         nky        nek
SFX Q   nek         nku        nek
SFX Q   nek         nkum       nek
SFX Q   nek         ncich      nek
SFX Q   em          mu         em
SFX Q   em          me         em
SFX Q   em          mem        em
SFX Q   em          my         em
SFX Q   em          mu         em
SFX Q   em          mum        em
SFX Q   em          mech       em
SFX Q   en          nu         en
SFX Q   en          ne         en
SFX Q   en          nem        en
SFX Q   en          ny         en
SFX Q   en          nu         en
SFX Q   en          num        en
SFX Q   en          nech       en
SFX Q   et          tu         et
SFX Q   et          te         et
SFX Q   et          tem        et
SFX Q   et          ty         et
SFX Q   et          tu         et
SFX Q   et          tum        et
SFX Q   et          tech       et
SFX Q   ev          vu         ev
SFX Q   ev          ve         ev
SFX Q   ev          vem        ev
SFX Q   ev          vy         ev
SFX Q   ev          vu         ev
SFX Q   ev          vum        ev
SFX Q   ev          vech       ev
SFX Q   es          u          es
SFX Q   es          e          [^ghk]es
SFX Q   es          em         es
SFX Q   es          y          es
SFX Q   es          u          es
SFX Q   es          um         es
SFX Q   os          ech        [^ghk]es
SFX Q   ges         zich       ges
SFX Q   ches        sich       ches
SFX Q   hes         zich       [^c]hes
SFX Q   kes         cich       kes
SFX Q   os          u          os
SFX Q   os          e          [^ghk]os
SFX Q   os          em         os
SFX Q   os          y          os
SFX Q   os          u          os
SFX Q   os          um         os
SFX Q   os          ech        [^ghk]os
SFX Q   gos         zich       gos
SFX Q   chos        sich       chos
SFX Q   hos         zich       [^c]hos
SFX Q   kos         cich       kos
SFX Q   us          u          us
SFX Q   us          e          [^ghk]us
SFX Q   us          em         us
SFX Q   us          y          us
SFX Q   us          u          us
SFX Q   us          um         us
SFX Q   us          ech        [^ghk]us
SFX Q   gus         zich       gus
SFX Q   chus        sich       chus
SFX Q   hus         zich       [^c]hus
SFX Q   kus         cich       kus
SFX Q   smus        zmus       ismus
SFX Q   smus        zmu        ismus
SFX Q   smus        zme        ismus
SFX Q   smus        zmem       ismus
SFX Q   smus        zmy        ismus
SFX Q   smus        zmu        ismus
SFX Q   smus        zmum       ismus
SFX Q   smus        zmech      ismus
SFX Q   s           tu         ns
SFX Q   s           te         ns
SFX Q   s           tem        ns
SFX Q   s           ty         ns
SFX Q   s           tu         ns
SFX Q   s           tum        ns
SFX Q   s           tech       ns
