installation/solr-6.x/kramerius/cs_CZ_ascii.dic
acetylceluloza/ZQ
aerodynamika/ZQ
agenda/ZQ
akademicka/ZQ
akvarelistka/ZQ
Alhambra/ZQ
AltaVista/ZQ
amerikanistka/ZQ
analytika/ZQ
anestesiolozka/ZQ
Anjelika/ZQ
antidiabetikum/MQ
antikva/ZQ
antispasmodikum/MQ
apogeum/MQ
arganolozka/ZQ
arteritida/ZQ
astmaticka/ZQ
atletka/ZQ
autacek/Q
automapa/ZQ
auxolozka/ZQ
azylantka/ZQ
bahnicka/ZQ
balonacek/Q
baracnice/ZQ
barvirka/ZQ
bavlna/ZQ
begonka/ZQ
belozarka/ZQ
bernolakovstina/ZQ
bezenka/ZQ
bilingvismus/Q
biokosmetika/ZQ
bitonalita/ZQ
bleskovice/ZQ
bodalka/ZQ
bolerko/MQ
Borovno/MQ
bradicka/ZQ
Bremy/ZQ
brosma/ZQ
bremeno/MQIR
buditelka/ZQ
bundicka/ZQ
bystrina/ZQ
cejchovacka/ZQ
cenzura/ZQ
cigaro/MQ
citecek/Q
copanek/Q
cyanoza/ZQ
cajovna/ZQ
cekanka/ZQ
certovina/ZQ
ciperka/ZQ
cokolada/ZQ
ctyrstovka/ZQ
cuprinka/ZQ
Danka/ZQ
debilita/ZQ
dehet/Q
deloha/ZQ
denivka/ZQ
desetina/ZQ
devadesatnice/ZQ
diabetes/Q
dietolozka/ZQ
disciplina/ZQ
diverzita/ZQ
dobrodruzka/ZQ
dohravka/ZQ
Dominicanka/ZQ
Dora/ZQ
dovolenka/ZQ
dratek/Q
drobnomalba/ZQ
druzstevnice/ZQ
dualismus/Q
duparna/ZQ
dvanactitunka/ZQ
dvojstranka/ZQ
dyhovka/ZQ
Edita/ZQ
ekosfera/ZQ
elektromechanicka/ZQ
embryum/MQ
entusiasmus/Q
erko/MQ
esteticno/MQ
eudaiminismus/Q
eventualita/ZQ
exocytoza/ZQ
extradice/ZQ
falsovatelka/ZQ
fauvismus/Q
fetacka/ZQ
filmecek/Q
flegmatismus/Q
forbina/ZQ
fotokatalyza/ZQ
Franca/ZQ
frezka/ZQ
futro/MQ
galaprehlidka/ZQ
garnitura/ZQ
geomechanika/ZQ
Gituska/ZQ
gongorismus/Q
grimasa/ZQ
gymnasium/MQ
hajecka/ZQ
Hanyzka/ZQ
Hebridy/ZQ
henka/ZQ
hexoda/ZQ
hlasivka/ZQ
hloubka/ZQ
hobra/ZQ
holokrcka/ZQ
hornatina/ZQ
houpacka/ZQ
hradba/ZQ
hrdlo/MQ
hruza/ZQ
hudebnice/ZQ
hvezda/ZQ
Hydrus/Q
hyposenzibilita/ZQ
chata/ZQ
chmura/ZQ
Choustnikovo/MQ
chudinka/ZQ
iberstina/ZQ
ilusionistka/ZQ
individualismus/Q
inkognito/MQ
internacionalistka/ZQ
iracionalita/ZQ
Ivana/ZQ
Jaffa/ZQ
japanistka/ZQ
jedenactiletka/ZQ
jelenice/ZQ
jezinka/ZQ
jircha/ZQ
jizvicka/ZQ
juchtovice/ZQ
kacko/MQ
kaktusarka/ZQ
kamaradka/ZQ
Kampucia/ZQ
kapalina/ZQ
Kapverdanka/ZQ
karikaturistka/ZQ
kartoteka/ZQ
katalyza/ZQ
kavalkada/ZQ
kericek/Q
Kladruby/HQ
klepacka/ZQ
klika/ZQ
klubko/MQ
knirek/Q
kokainistka/ZQ
kolejnice/ZQ
kolo/MQR
komenda/ZQ
komponenta/ZQ
konecek/Q
konserva/ZQ
konvertibilita/ZQ
Kopidlno/MQ
korepetitorka/ZQ
kosinka/ZQ
kosicek/Q
kousek/Q
kozesinka/ZQ
Kralupy/ZQ
Kravsko/MQ
kriminolozka/ZQ
krosnicka/ZQ
kryotechnika/ZQ
kridlovka/ZQ
kubenka/ZQ
kulajda/ZQ
kupka/ZQ
kutna/ZQ
kvazigrupa/ZQ
kyberkultura/ZQ
kyvadelko/MQ
lajdacka/ZQ
lanko/MQ
laticka/ZQ
lecivo/MQ
lekarna/ZQ
leporelo/MQ
letora/ZQ
Libena/ZQ
lidovka/ZQ
Lindava/ZQ
liska/ZQ
lobbismus/Q
lokomotivka/ZQ
louskacek/Q
Ludvika/ZQ
Luzice/ZQ
maceska/ZQ
magnetooptika/ZQ
makacka/ZQ
malerecka/ZQ
maminka/ZQ
maniodepresivita/ZQ
Marcelka/ZQ
Martinka/ZQ
masochismus/Q
matinka/ZQ
Mazda/ZQ
megera/ZQ
memorandum/MQ
mesianismus/Q
metastruktura/ZQ
mezirka/ZQ
mikrobiolozka/ZQ
Milena/ZQ
mineralka/ZQ
mitra/ZQ
modlitba/ZQ
montgolfiera/ZQ
motorka/ZQ
multikulturalismus/Q
myslenka/ZQ
nadrealismus/Q
namaha/ZQ
nasledovnice/ZQ
Naxos/Q
neodbornice/ZQ
nestoudnice/ZQ
nikotinismus/Q
nositka/MQ
numero/MQ
oblecek/Q
ocaska/ZQ
Odolena/ZQ
ohanka/ZQ
oktaacetylsacharoza/ZQ
onkolozka/ZQ
optoelektronika/ZQ
Osicko/MQ
ostricka/ZQ
ozimka/ZQ
palenice/ZQ
panorama/KZQ
parazitismus/Q
pastilka/ZQ
pavlacka/ZQ
pendrek/Q
peronistka/ZQ
petrolejarka/ZQ
pipka/ZQ
placebo/MQ
plazicka/ZQ
plostice/ZQ
podesta/ZQ
podstanice/ZQ
pochutina/ZQ
policek/Q
polstarek/Q
porada/ZQ
postkomunismus/Q
poupatko/MQ
pradelna/ZQ
pravdepodobno/MQN
princezna/ZQ
prolaklina/ZQ
prosturka/ZQ
proverka/ZQ
prvoligistka/ZQ
predsinka/ZQ
presmycka/ZQ
Primda/ZQ
privlastek/Q
psychosomatika/ZQ
punticek/Q
radiolecba/ZQ
ranka/ZQ
regionalismus/Q
restauratorka/ZQ
rizoto/MQ
rosa/ZQ
rozmaryna/ZQ
rucicka/ZQ
rvacka/ZQ
rasinka/ZQ
saboterka/ZQ
samosoudkyne/ZQ
sbijecka/ZQ
Sedmihradsko/MQ
seniorka/ZQ
sextiliarda/ZQ
sindhstina/ZQ
skladanka/ZQ
skulina/ZQ
slintavka/ZQ
sluzebnictvo/MQ
Snezka/ZQ
solo/MQ
spalenina/ZQ
spojka/ZQ
spustadlo/MQ
starousedlice/ZQ
stezka/ZQ
straka/ZQ
stredoskolacka/ZQ
Stvoridla/MQ
supernabidka/ZQ
svetacka/ZQ
sykorice/ZQ
samanismus/Q
sestina/ZQ
skolicka/ZQ
soferka/ZQ
stavnatka/ZQ
sunka/ZQ
tanecnice/ZQ
telefoto/MQ
teritorium/MQ
thorium/MQ
tmarka/ZQ
toxicita/ZQ
travnicka/ZQ
trojice/ZQ
Trebsko/MQ
tunka/ZQ
uctivacka/ZQ
ukladatelka/ZQ
unitaristka/ZQ
Usobrno/MQ
uzlinka/ZQ
varhanarka/ZQ
veda/ZQ
Vendula/ZQ
vestka/ZQ
viklefistka/ZQ
vitrinka/ZQ
vlnovka/ZQ
Volta/ZQ
vrstvicka/ZQ
vydobytek/Q
vymena/ZQ
vyskytovatelka/ZQ
vyveva/ZQ
xyloza/ZQ
zakladatelka/ZQ
zapustka/ZQ
zavada/ZQ
zdrhovadlo/MQ
Zlatenka/ZQ
zornicka/ZQ
Zuzana/ZQ
zebernatka/ZQ
ziravina/ZQ
